Utah statutes.
4-18-5.   Conservation commission -- Functions and duties.
(1)  The commission shall:
(a)  facilitate the development and implementation of the strategies and
programs necessary to protect, conserve, utilize, and develop the soil and
water resources of the state;
(b)  disseminate information regarding districts' activities and programs;
(c)  supervise the formation, reorganization, or dissolution of districts
according to the requirements of Title 17D, Chapter 3, Conservation District
Act;
(d)  prescribe uniform accounting and recordkeeping procedures for districts
and require each district to submit annually an audit of its funds to the
commission;
(e)  approve and make loans for agricultural purposes, from the Agriculture
Resource Development Fund for:
(i)  nonfederal rangeland improvement and management projects;
(ii)  watershed protection and flood prevention projects;
(iii)  agricultural cropland soil and water conservation projects; and
(iv)  programs designed to promote energy efficient farming practices;
(f)  administer federal or state funds in accordance with applicable federal
or state guidelines and make loans or grants from those funds to land
occupiers for the conservation of soil or water resources;
(g)  seek to coordinate soil and water protection, conservation, and
development activities and programs of state agencies, local governmental
units, other states, special interest groups, and federal agencies; and
(h)  plan watershed and flood control projects in cooperation with appropriate
local, state, and federal authorities and coordinate flood control projects in
the state.
(2)  The commission may:
(a)  employ, with the approval of the department, an administrator and
necessary technical experts and employees;
(b)  execute contracts or other instruments necessary to exercise its powers;
(c)  sue and be sued; and
(d)  adopt rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, necessary to carry out the powers and duties specified in
Subsections (1)(d), (e), (f), and (2)(b).
